Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-383
Tax expenditure report; department; access to information.

The department may request from any state or local official or agency any information necessary to complete the report required under section 77-382. All state and local officials or agencies shall cooperate with the department with respect to any such request.

Laws 1979, LB 17, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,1979, § 77-357;

Laws 1980, LB 834, § 24;

Laws 2014, LB989, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB1048, § 8.
July 18, 2026